Tennessee statutes. Title 10 Public Libraries, Archives and Records
Part 2

Index of Public Records

10-7-201. Clerks, registers, and other officers to index records.

Every clerk, register, or other public officer whose duty it may be to keep record books, wherein the records of any court or of any county shall be kept, shall keep an index to each book wherein any suit, decree, judgment, sale, mortgage, transfer, lien, deed, power of attorney, or other record, shall be kept, in which index such clerk, register, or public officer shall enter in alphabetical order, under the name of each party, every suit, judgment, decree, sale, deed, mortgage, or other matter of record required by law to be by such clerk, register or other public officer entered in the record books to be kept by such clerk, register, or other officer, to the end that any judgment, decree, sale, conveyance, mortgage, or other record may be found under the name of either party to any transaction of record.

Acts 1871, ch. 85, § 1; Shan., § 5853; Code 1932, § 10055; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-201.

Cross-References. Depositions taken to perpetuate testimony, entering upon book, § 8-13-108.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Recording Acts, §§ 2, 12.

10-7-202. Register's book to be indexed, direct and reverse — Maintenance of indices by electronic means.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, each register not maintaining all indices required by law on a medium to be read and used by means of a computer or a word processor shall procure as provided by § 10-7-102 or other general law, two (2) or more well-bound books of suitable size, volume and grade of paper, in which the register shall make, enter, and keep a general direct and general reverse index of each and every instrument filed for record or recorded in the office of register, except that notices of completion of improvements to real estate and such other instruments that are not susceptible to direct and reverse indexation may be indexed separately using only a direct index and not entered in a reverse index.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, each register shall have discretion regarding whether to maintain separate indices for distinct books, files, or groups or combinations of records, or whether to combine all indices in a master direct and reverse index for all records maintained in the office of the county register.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, registers may maintain all indices required of the office by electronic means in compliance with the requirements found in § 10-7-121.

Acts 1925, ch. 89, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 567a1; Code 1932, § 817; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-202; Acts 1985, ch. 212, § 1; 1988, ch. 636, § 6; 2020, ch. 798, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote (b) which read: “Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, each register is authorized to maintain all indices required of the office on a medium to be read and used by means of a computer and/or word processor. If such a computer medium is used, a security copy of the medium shall be maintained and a hardcopy paper printout of the index information shall be made at least weekly in duplicate, and at least one (1) such paper copy shall be stored in a safe place other than the register's office. A computer hardcopy printout may be used in lieu of a bound book, but the register shall take due care to preserve the computer printout as a permanent record. The use of the computer hardcopy printouts by the public may be banned or restricted by each register, so long as computers or word processors are available and operable for viewing the information contained in the restricted printouts.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 798, § 2. July 15, 2020.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

10-7-203. Names in deeds of realty to be entered alphabetically in the direct and reverse indices — Other facts to be shown.

In the general direct indices of instruments relating to real estate, the register shall enter the name of the grantor or maker of each instrument recorded, alphabetically arranged, the name of the person, firm, or corporation to whom made, the kind of instrument, its date and the date filed for record, each entry to be under the appropriate head title or column. In like manner, the register shall enter in each reverse index the name of the person, firm, or corporation to whom each conveyance or grant is made, alphabetically arranged, the name of the person, firm, or corporation or other maker by whom executed or made, the character and date of the instrument, and the date filed for record, each entry under its appropriate column or head title. In each book the register shall also enter the book and page in which each respective instrument is recorded in the appropriate column and under the appropriate heading therefor.

Acts 1893, ch. 66, § 2; Shan., § 5856; Acts 1925, ch. 89, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 567a2; Code 1932, §§ 818, 10058; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-203.

Cross-References. Book of trust deeds, § 8-13-108.

Cross indexing to all parties, § 10-7-209.

Depositions taken to perpetuate testimony, entering upon book, § 8-13-108.

Direct and reverse indices, § 10-7-209.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

10-7-204. Direct and reverse indices to personalty — Manner of making.

In the two (2) indices of instruments relating to personal property, the register shall likewise enter and keep alphabetically the names of the grantors or persons, firms, or corporations executing or making the contracts or instruments recorded in the direct index, and the name of the persons, firms, or corporations to whom the conveyances or grants are made, in alphabetical order, in the reverse index, followed by the other entries as above required in regard to instruments relating to real estate. Instruments relating to both realty and personalty shall be indexed in each of the above named sets of indices and as above required.

Acts 1925, ch. 89, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 567a3; Code 1932, § 819; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-204.

10-7-205. Time of making indices — One or more indices — Mortgages and deeds of trust.

It is the duty of the register to make the entries required in §§ 10-7-202 — 10-7-204 for all instruments immediately upon their being recorded; provided, that at the discretion of the register, the register may:

Index all instruments purporting to convey titles to land in one (1) or more indices, indexing them direct and reverse as provided for in §§ 10-7-201 — 10-7-206;

Keep all deeds of trust or land mortgages in one (1) or more indices, indexing them direct and reverse as required by §§ 10-7-201 — 10-7-206;

Keep all trust deeds or land mortgages and chattel mortgages and other instruments relating to personalty in one (1) or more indices, indexing them direct and reverse as required in §§ 10-7-201 — 10-7-206;

Keep chattel mortgages, in an index, indexing them direct and reverse as required in §§ 10-7-201 — 10-7-206; or

Keep a direct index of chattel mortgages in the same book or volume in which the chattel mortgages are registered or recorded.

Acts 1925, ch. 89, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 567a4; Code 1932, § 820; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-205.

Cross-References. Book of trust deeds, § 8-13-108.

10-7-206. Former indices may be made in addition to required indices.

The indices required to be made and kept shall be in lieu of all indices heretofore required of registers; provided, that any register may continue to make and keep such indices previously required, as the register may determine, in addition to the indices required by §§ 10-7-202 — 10-7-205.

Acts 1925, ch. 89, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 567a6; Code 1932, § 821; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-206.

10-7-207. Failure to make index — Forfeiture — Qui tam action.

For failing to make such index as prescribed, the register shall forfeit one hundred dollars ($100), one-half (½) to the use of the state and the other one-half (½) to any person who shall sue for the same.

Code 1858, § 455 (deriv. Acts 1839-1840, ch. 26, § 12); Shan., § 569; Code 1932, § 824; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-207.

10-7-208. Penalty for failure to index records.

Any clerk, register, or other public officer required by law to keep any record book who willfully violates §§ 10-7-201 — 10-7-207 commits a Class C misdemeanor, and, moreover, such person and such person's official sureties are liable to the injured party for all damage sustained by the injured party, in consequence of such failure, to be recovered before any court of competent jurisdiction.

Acts 1871, ch. 85, § 2; Shan., § 5854; Code 1932, § 10056; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-208; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Indictable and suable for nonperformance of duties, § 8-13-110.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 13; 21 Tenn. Juris., Recording Acts, § 2.

10-7-209. Cross index as to all parties in minute books and execution dockets.

The clerks of the supreme court and the clerks of all courts of record are hereby required to index and cross index each record of the minutes of the courts and the execution dockets so respectively required to be kept by them, showing in the direct index, in alphabetical order, the name or names of the plaintiffs or complainants, and against whom the suit is or was brought and, in the cross or reverse index, show the name or names of defendants, in alphabetical order, and by whom the suit is brought.

Acts 1893, ch. 66, § 1; Shan., § 5855; Code 1932, § 10057; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-209.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 13; 21 Tenn. Juris., Recording Acts, § 12.

10-7-210. Violations of preceding section a misdemeanor.

For failure or refusal to carry out or comply with § 10-7-209, such clerk commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1893, ch. 66, § 3; Shan., § 5857; Code 1932, § 10059; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 15-210; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.